Tennessee, session 114, SB0215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 43-27-203(d), is amended by adding
the following language at the end of the subsection:
A person violating subdivision (b)(2) or (b)(3) shall be sentenced to serve in the county
jail or workhouse not less than forty-eight (48) consecutive hours nor more than eleven
(11) months and twenty-nine (29) days and be fined not less than five hundred dollars
($500) nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 43-27-204(b), is amended by
deleting the language "to a customer." and substituting instead the following:
to a customer or an employee of the retail establishment who is younger than twenty-
one (21) years of age. It is unlawful for a retailer to knowingly allow an employee
younger than twenty-one (21) years of age to access, handle, or sell any product
containing a hemp-derived cannabinoid on the premises of the retail establishment.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0215
001017
- 1 -